Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.060

Courses exclusive to Washington State University.

The courses of instruction of Washington State University shall embrace as exclusive major lines, agriculture in all its branches and subdivisions, veterinary medicine, and economic science in its application to agriculture and rural life.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.060. Prior: 1917 c 10 s 3; RRS s 4534. Formerly RCW 28.80.025; 28.76.070, part.]